Utah statutes.
34A-3-102.   Chapter to be administered by commission -- Exclusive remedy.

(1)  The commission shall administer this chapter through the division, the Division of Adjudication, and the Appeals Board in accordance with Section 34A-2-112.

(2)  Subject to the limitations provided in this chapter and, unless otherwise noted, all provisions of Chapter 2, Workers' Compensation Act, and Chapter 8a, Utah Injured Worker Reemployment Act, are incorporated into this chapter and shall be applied to occupational disease claims.

(3)  The right to recover compensation under this chapter for diseases or injuries to health sustained by a Utah employee is the exclusive remedy as outlined in Section 34A-2-105.

